Hawaii statutes.
[§21F-4] Selection of members;
co-chairpersons; filling vacancies. The committee shall consist of five
members of the senate and five members of the house who shall be selected in
the manner provided for in the rules of the senate and the rules of the house.
The president of the senate and the speaker of the house shall select the
members of the committee, including members of the majority leadership, members
of the minority leadership, the chairperson of the senate ways and means
committee, and the chairperson of the house finance committee. The chairperson
of the senate ways and means committee and the chairperson of the house finance
committee shall serve as co-chairpersons of the committee. Vacancies occurring
in the membership of the committee shall be filled in the manner provided for
in the rules of the senate and the rules of the house. A vacancy shall be
deemed to exist as to any member of the committee whose term is expiring
whenever the member is not reelected at the general election. [L 1990, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next